prince/dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX Q Y 1396
SFX Q as      asis            as        
SFX Q as      ojo             as        
SFX Q as      ajam            as        
SFX Q as      ąjį             as        
SFX Q as      uoju            as        
SFX Q as      ajame           as        
SFX Q as      ieji            [^i]as    
SFX Q ias     ieji            [^čž]ias  
SFX Q čias    tieji           čias      
SFX Q ias     ieji            [^d]žias  
SFX Q džias   dieji           džias     
SFX Q as      ųjų             as        
SFX Q as      iesiems         [^i]as    
SFX Q ias     iesiems         [^čž]ias  
SFX Q čias    tiesiems        čias      
SFX Q ias     iesiems         [^d]žias  
SFX Q džias   diesiems        džias     
SFX Q as      uosius          as        
SFX Q as      aisiais         as        
SFX Q as      uosiuose        as        
SFX Q as      oji             as        
SFX Q as      osios           as        
SFX Q as      ajai            as        
SFX Q as      ąją             as        
SFX Q as      ąja             as        
SFX Q as      ojoj            as        
SFX Q as      ojoje           as        
SFX Q as      osioms          as        
SFX Q as      ąsias           as        
SFX Q as      osiomis         as        
SFX Q as      osiose          as        
SFX Q is      ysis            is        
SFX Q is      įjį             is        
SFX Q is      iojo            [^dt]is   
SFX Q is      iajam           [^dt]is   
SFX Q is      iuoju           [^dt]is   
SFX Q is      iajame          [^dt]is   
SFX Q dis     džiojo          dis       
SFX Q dis     džiajam         dis       
SFX Q dis     džiuoju         dis       
SFX Q dis     džiajame        dis       
SFX Q tis     čiojo           tis       
SFX Q tis     čiajam          tis       
SFX Q tis     čiuoju          tis       
SFX Q tis     čiajame         tis       
SFX Q is      ieji            is        
SFX Q is      iesiems         is        
SFX Q dis     džiųjų          dis       
SFX Q dis     džiuosius       dis       
SFX Q dis     džiaisiais      dis       
SFX Q dis     džiuosiuose     dis       
SFX Q tis     čiųjų           tis       
SFX Q tis     čiuosius        tis       
SFX Q tis     čiaisiais       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiuosiuose      tis       
SFX Q is      iųjų            [^dt]is   
SFX Q is      iuosius         [^dt]is   
SFX Q is      iaisiais        [^dt]is   
SFX Q is      iuosiuose       [^dt]is   
SFX Q dis     džioji          dis       
SFX Q dis     džiosios        dis       
SFX Q dis     džiajai         dis       
SFX Q dis     džiąją          dis       
SFX Q dis     džiąja          dis       
SFX Q dis     džiojoj         dis       
SFX Q dis     džiojoje        dis       
SFX Q dis     džiosioms       dis       
SFX Q dis     džiąsias        dis       
SFX Q dis     džiosiomis      dis       
SFX Q dis     džiosiose       dis       
SFX Q tis     čioji           tis       
SFX Q tis     čiosios         tis       
SFX Q tis     čiajai          tis       
SFX Q tis     čiąją           tis       
SFX Q tis     čiąja           tis       
SFX Q tis     čiojoj          tis       
SFX Q tis     čiojoje         tis       
SFX Q tis     čiosioms        tis       
SFX Q tis     čiąsias         tis       
SFX Q tis     čiosiomis       tis       
SFX Q tis     čiosiose        tis       
SFX Q jis     joji            jis       
SFX Q jis     josios          jis       
SFX Q jis     jajai           jis       
SFX Q jis     jąją            jis       
SFX Q jis     jąja            jis       
SFX Q jis     jojoj           jis       
SFX Q jis     jojoje          jis       
SFX Q jis     jųjų            jis       
SFX Q jis     josioms         jis       
SFX Q jis     jąsias          jis       
SFX Q jis     josiomis        jis       
SFX Q jis     josiose         jis       
SFX Q is      ioji            [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iosios          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iajai           [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iąją            [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iąja            [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iojoj           [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iojoje          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iųjų            [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iosioms         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iąsias          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iosiomis        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iosiose         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q ys      ysis            ys        
SFX Q ys      iojo            ys        
SFX Q ys      iajam           ys        
SFX Q ys      įjį             ys        
SFX Q ys      iuoju           ys        
SFX Q ys      iajame          ys        
SFX Q ys      ieji            ys        
SFX Q ys      iųjų            ys        
SFX Q ys      iesiems         ys        
SFX Q ys      iuosius         ys        
SFX Q ys      iaisiais        ys        
SFX Q ys      iuosiuose       ys        
SFX Q ys      ioji            ys        
SFX Q ys      iosios          ys        
SFX Q ys      iajai           ys        
SFX Q ys      iąją            ys        
SFX Q ys      iąja            ys        
SFX Q ys      iojoj           ys        
SFX Q ys      iojoje          ys        
SFX Q ys      iosioms         ys        
SFX Q ys      iąsias          ys        
SFX Q ys      iosiomis        ys        
SFX Q ys      iosiose         ys        
SFX Q us      usis            us        
SFX Q us      ųjį             us        
SFX Q tus     čiojo           tus       
SFX Q tus     čiajam          tus       
SFX Q tus     čiuoju          tus       
SFX Q dus     džiojo          dus       
SFX Q dus     džiajam         dus       
SFX Q dus     džiuoju         dus       
SFX Q jus     jojo            jus       
SFX Q jus     jajam           jus       
SFX Q jus     juoju           jus       
SFX Q us      iojo            [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iajam           [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iuoju           [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iajame          [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      ieji            us        
SFX Q us      iesiems         us        
SFX Q dus     džiųjų          dus       
SFX Q dus     džiuosius       dus       
SFX Q dus     džiaisiais      dus       
SFX Q dus     džiuosiuose     dus       
SFX Q tus     čiųjų           tus       
SFX Q tus     čiuosius        tus       
SFX Q tus     čiaisiais       tus       
SFX Q tus     čiuosiuose      tus       
SFX Q jus     jųjų            jus       
SFX Q jus     juosius         jus       
SFX Q jus     jaisiais        jus       
SFX Q jus     juosiuose       jus       
SFX Q us      iųjų            [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iuosius         [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iaisiais        [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iuosiuose       [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      ioji            [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iosios          [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iajai           [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iąją            [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iąja            [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iojoj           [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iojoje          [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iosioms         [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iąsias          [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iosiomis        [^dtj]us  
SFX Q us      iosiose         [^dtj]us  
SFX Q tus     čioji           tus       
SFX Q tus     čiosios         tus       
SFX Q tus     čiajai          tus       
SFX Q tus     čiąją           tus       
SFX Q tus     čiąja           tus       
SFX Q tus     čiojoj          tus       
SFX Q tus     čiojoje         tus       
SFX Q tus     čiosioms        tus       
SFX Q tus     čiąsias         tus       
SFX Q tus     čiosiomis       tus       
SFX Q tus     čiosiose        tus       
SFX Q jus     joji            jus       
SFX Q jus     josios          jus       
SFX Q jus     jajai           jus       
SFX Q jus     jąją            jus       
SFX Q jus     jąja            jus       
SFX Q jus     jojoj           jus       
SFX Q jus     jojoje          jus       
SFX Q jus     josioms         jus       
SFX Q jus     jąsias          jus       
SFX Q jus     josiomis        jus       
SFX Q jus     josiose         jus       
