prince/dictionaries/lt.dic
abstraktus/AQN
adaptyvus/AQN
aikštingas/AQN
aiškus/AQN
aistringas/ANQ
akademiškas/AQ
akivaizdus/AQN
akylas/ANQ
aklinas/AQN
akmenuotas/AQN
aktyvus/AQN
aktualus/AQN
alternatyvus/AQ
amžinas/AQN
analogiškas/AQN
ankstyvas/AQN
ankstus/AQN
anonimiškas/AQN
apmaudus/AQN
aprėpiamas/AQN
apskritas/AQN
arabiškas/AQN
archajiškas/AQ
arčiausias/AQ
aršus/AQN
artimas/AQN
asmeniškas/AQN
asociatyvus/AQN
aštrus/AQN
atidus/AQN
atitinkamas/AQN
atkaklus/AQN
atlaidus/AQN
atsakingas/AQN
atsargus/AQN
atšiaurus/AQN
atskiras/AQN
atsparus/AQN
atviras/AQN
atvirkščias/AQN
aukštas/AQN
autentiškas/AQN
automatiškas/AQN
azartiškas/AQN
bailus/AQN
baisus/AQN
balsingas/AQN
baltas/AQN
banalus/AQN
bendras/AQN
beprasmiškas/AQN
bergždžias/AQN
betarpiškas/AQN
beviltiškas/AQ
bjaurus/AQN
blankus/AQ
brangus/AQN
būtinas/AQN
dailus/AQN
dangiškas/AQN
dažnas/AQN
dėkingas/AQN
dešinys/AQ
detalus/AQN
diletantiškas/AQN
disciplinuotas/AQN
diskursiškas/AQN
drąsus/AQN
drausmingas/ANQ
efektyvus/AQN
ekologiškas/AQN
ekstemalus/AQN
ekstravertiškas/ANQ
elegantiškas/AQN
empatiškas/AQN
eretiškas/AQ
familiarus/AQN
fantastiškas/AQN
fiziškas/AQN
fundamentalus/AQN
gailestingas/AQN
gaivus/ANQ
garbingas/AQN
gardus/AQN
gauruotas/AQN
gelsvas/AQ
genialus/AQN
geras/AQN
giedras/AQ
gimtas/AQN
gyvybingas/AQN
glaudus/AQN
gležnas/ANQ
glodus/AQN
gramatiškas/ANQ
greitas/AQN
griežtas/AQN
gudrus/AQN
gulsčias/AQN
idealus/AQN
įdomus/AQN
ilgas/AQN
individualus/AQN
iniciatyvinis/AQ
intelektualus/AQN
intensyvus/AQN
intravertiškas/ANQ
įprastas/AQN
išmintingas/AQN
ispaniškas/AQ
išraiškingas/ANQ
įstrižas/AQN
įtartinas/AQN
įvairus/AQN
įžūlus/AQN
ypatingas/AQN
jaukus/AQN
jautrus/AQN
juodas/AQ
kairys/AQ
kantrus/AQN
kartus/AQN
kemsėtas/ANQ
kiauras/AQN
kietas/AQN
kintamas/AQN
klaikus/ANQ
kompaktiškas/AQN
konkurentabilus/AQN
korėjietiškas/AQ
kreivas/AQN
kritiškas/AQN
kruopštus/AQN
kuklus/AQN
kūniškas/AQN
kūrybingas/AQN
labas/AQN
laimingas/AQN
lakoniškas/ANQ
legalus/AQN
lengvas/AQN
lėtas/AQN
lietingas/ANQ
linksmas/AQN
liūdnas/AQN
lygus/AQN
lokalus/AQN
maksimalus/AQN
mandagus/AQN
masiškas/ANQ
mauriškas/AQN
mėgėjiškas/AQN
meilus/AQN
menkas/AQN
milžiniškas/AQ
minkštas/AQN
mistiškas/AQN
modernus/AQN
morališkas/AQ
murzinas/AQN
natūralus/AQN
naujas/AQN
neįgalus/AQ
nervingas/ANQ
neurotoksiškas/AQN
neveiklus/AQN
nykstamas/AQN
normatyvus/AQ
nuobodus/AQN
nuodugnus/AQN
nuoseklus/AQN
nuostabus/AQN
objektyvus/AQN
olandiškas/AQ
oranžinis/AQ
padorus/AQN
painus/AQN
paklusnus/AQN
palaimingas/AQ
panašus/AQN
pasyvus/AQN
pastaras/AQN
patogus/AQN
pavasariškas/AQN
pavojingas/AQN
pelkėtas/AQN
pergalingas/AQN
perspektyvus/AQN
pigus/AQN
piktas/AQN
pilnas/AQN
platus/AQN
plynas/AQ
plonas/AQN
portabilus/AQN
pozityvus/AQN
prastas/AQN
priešiškas/AQN
prietaringas/AQN
primityvus/AQN
privalomas/AQN
problematiškas/AQN
profesionalus/AQN
puikus/AQN
purus/AQN
racionalus/AQN
raibas/AQN
ramus/AQN
rausvas/AQ
reguliarus/AQN
reikšmingas/ANQ
reliatyvus/AQN
religiškas/AQN
rezultatyvus/AQN
rišlus/AQN
rizikingas/AQN
romantiškas/AQN
rudas/AQ
rumuniškas/AQ
rūstus/AQ
saikingas/AQN
šališkas/AQN
sąmoningas/AQN
sausas/AQN
savitas/AQ
sąžiningas/AQN
sėkmingas/AQN
senas/AQN
siaubingas/AQN
šiaurus/AQ
šiltas/AQN
sinchroniškas/AQN
šiuolaikiškas/AQN
skambus/AQN
skardus/AQN
skausmingas/AQN
skystas/AQN
skoningas/AQN
slankus/AQN
slaptas/AQN
šlykštus/AQN
smagus/AQN
smalsus/AQN
smulkus/AQN
socialus/AQN
sotus/AQN
spartus/AQN
spontaniškas/AQ
stačias/AQN
staigus/AQN
status/AQN
stiprus/AQN
studentiškas/AQN
subtilus/AQN
sudėtingas/AQN
svarbus/AQN
sveikas/AQN
šventas/AQN
šviesus/AQN
šviežias/AQN
talentingas/AQN
tankus/AQN
technologizuotas/AQN
teisingas/AQN
teisus/AQN
teritorinis/BQ
tikras/AQN
tikslingas/AQN
tingus/AQN
tipiškas/AQN
tirštas/AQN
tobulas/AQN
tolimas/AQN
tolygus/AQN
tradiciškas/AQN
triukšmingas/AQN
trumpas/AQN
tuščias/AQN
tvirtas/AQN
uolus/AQN
vaikiškas/AQN
vakarietiškas/AQN
vėjuotas/AQN
velniškas/AQ
vengriškas/AQ
vertikalus/AQN
vešlus/AQN
vienalaikis/BQ
vieningas/AQN
vienodas/AQN
viešas/AQN
virtualus/AQ
visiškas/AQN
vizualus/AQN
vyriausias/AQ
žalias/AQN
žalsvas/AQ
žiaurus/AQN
žydras/AQN
žmogiškas/AQN
žvalus/AQN
